Massachusetts, session 194th, H4311.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 305 of the acts of 2016 is hereby amended by inserting
after the word "units", the first time it appears, the following words:- and year-round ownership
opportunities.
SECTION 2. Subsection (a) of section 2 of said chapter 305 is hereby amended by
striking out the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- The trust
shall be managed by a board of trustees consisting of 5 members and 2 alternate members.
SECTION 3. Clause (iii) of said subsection (a) of said section 2 of said chapter 305 is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “members” the following words:- and 2 alternate
members.
of 2

SECTION 4. Section 3 of said chapter 305 is hereby amended by striking out the words
“Year-round Market Rate Rental Housing Trust Fund” and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- Year-Round Market Rate Housing Trust Fund.
SECTION 5. Section 5 of said chapter 305 is hereby amended by inserting the following
word after the word "rental" the following words:- or ownership.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2